en: wine, fruit wine
af: wyn
am: የወይን ጠጅ
an: Vin
ar: نبيذ
az: Şərab
ba: Шарап
be: віно
bg: вино
bn: মদ
br: Gwin
bs: Vino
ca: vi
ce: ЧагӀар
cs: víno
cv: Эрех
cy: gwin
da: vin
de: Wein
el: κρασί
eo: vino
es: vino
et: vein
eu: ardo
fa: شراب
fi: viini
fo: Vín
fr: vin
fy: Wyn
ga: Fíon
gd: Fìon
gl: Viño
gv: Feeyn
he: יין
hi: शराब
hr: vino, vina
ht: Diven
hu: bor
hy: գինի
ia: vino
io: vino
is: vín
it: vino
ja: ワイン
ka: ღვინო
kk: Шарап
km: ស្រា
ko: 포도주
ku: Şerab
ky: Шарап
la: vinum
lb: Wäin
li: Wien
lt: vynas
lv: vīns
mk: вино
ml: വീഞ്ഞ്
mn: Дарс
mr: वाईन
ms: Wain
mt: nbid
my: ဝိုင်
nb: vin
ne: वाइन
nl: wijn
nn: vin
oc: vin
pa: ਵਾਈਨ
pl: wino
pt: vinho
qu: Winu
ro: vin
ru: вино
sc: Binu
se: Viidna
sh: Vino
sk: víno
sl: vino
sq: vera
sr: вино
sv: vin
sw: divai
ta: வைன்
tg: Шароб
th: ไวน์
tl: Alak
tr: şarap
tt: Шәраб
ug: ۋىنو
uk: вино
ur: شراب
uz: Sharob
vi: rượu vang
vo: Vein
wa: Vén
xh: Iveyn
yi: וויין
zh: 葡萄酒

en: pedro ximenez wine
es: vino Pedro Ximenez
hr: vino pedro ximenez
it: vino Pedro Ximenez

en: natural sweet wine
fr: vin doux naturel
hr: prirodno slatko vino
it: vino dolce naturale

fr: vin de France, vin français
hu: francia bor, francia borok

en: sparkling wine
af: Vonkelwyn
ar: نبيذ فوار
be: Пеністае віно
bg: пенливо вино
ca: vi escumós
cs: sekt
da: Mousserende vin
de: Schaumwein, Perlwein, Sekt
el: αφρώδης οίνος
eo: Ŝaŭmvino
es: vino espumoso
et: Vahuvein
fa: شراب گازدار
fi: Kuohuviini
fo: Brúsandi vín
fr: vin mousseux
ga: Fíon cúrach
he: יין נתזים
hr: biser vino
hu: habzóbor, gyöngyözőbor
hy: փրփրուն գինի
it: vino spumante
ja: 発泡性ワイン
ko: 발포성 포도주
lt: Putojantis vynas
lv: dzirkstošais vīns
mk: Пенливо вино
nb: Musserende vin
nl: mousserende wijn
oc: Vin efervescent
pl: Wino musujące
pt: vinho espumante
ro: vin spumant
ru: Игристое вино
sk: sekt
sv: Mousserande vin
tr: Köpüklü şarap
uk: Ігристі вина
vi: Vang sủi
zh: 气泡酒

en: white wine
af: Witwyn
ar: نبيذ أبيض
ba: Аҡ шарап
bg: Бяло вино
ca: vi blanc
cy: Gwin gwyn
da: hvidvin
de: Weißwein, Weisswein
es: vino blanco
eu: Ardo zuri
fa: شراب سفید
fi: valkoviini
fo: Hvítvín
fr: vin blanc
gl: Viño branco
he: יין לבן
hr: bijelo vino
hu: fehérbor
it: vino bianco
ja: 白ワイン
kk: Ақ шарап
ko: 백포도주
lb: Wäisse Wäin
mk: Бело вино
nb: Hvitvin
nl: witte wijn
pl: Białe wino
pt: vinho branco
ro: vin alb
ru: Белое вино
sr: бијело вино
sv: vitt vin
tr: Beyaz şarap
uk: Біле вино
vi: Rượu vang trắng
zh: 白葡萄酒

en: dry white wine
bg: сухо бяло вино
da: tør hvidvin
de: trockener Weißwein
fi: kuiva valkoviini
fr: vin blanc sec
hr: suho bijelo vino
hu: száraz fehérbor
it: vino bianco secco
nl: droge witte wijn
ru: сухое белое вино
zh: 乾白葡萄酒

en: white wine from France
da: hvidvin fra Frankrig, fransk hvidvin
de: Weißwein aus Frankreich, französischer Weißwein
fr: vin blanc de France, vin blanc arbois aoc, vin blanc coteaux du layon aop, vin blanc condrieu aop, vin blanc coteaux du lyonnais aop
hr: bijelo vino iz Francuske
hu: francia fehérbor
it: vino bianco dalla Francia

en: white wine extract
bg: екстракт от бяло вино
de: Weißweinextrakt, Weissweinextrakt
es: Extracto de vino blanco
fi: valkoviiniuute
fr: extrait de vin blanc
hr: ekstrakt bijelog vina
hu: fehérbor kivonat
it: estratto di vino bianco
nl: witte wijnextract
sv: vitvinsextrakt

en: white wine from cava
es: vino blanco base cava
hr: bijelo vino iz cave
it: vino bianco di cava

en: muscadet
xx: muscadet
br: muskadig
cv: мюскаде
de: Muscadet
fr: muscadet, vin blanc muscadet
hr: muskadet
ja: ミュスカデ
ru: мюскаде

en: red wine
af: rooiwyn
ar: نبيذ أحمر
ba: ҡыҙыл шарап
bg: червено вино
ca: vi negre
da: rødvin
de: Rotwein
eo: ruĝa vino
es: vino tinto, vino tinto Mencia
eu: ardo beltz
fa: شراب سرخ
fi: punaviini
fo: Reyðvín
fr: vin rouge
gl: Viño tinto
he: יין אדום
hr: crno vino
hu: vörösbor
is: Rauðvín
it: vino rosso
ja: 赤ワイン
ka: წითელი ღვინო
kk: Қызыл таң
ko: 적포도주
lb: Roude Wäin
mk: Црвено вино
nb: rødvin
nl: rode wijn
nn: Raudvin
pl: Wino czerwone, czerwone wino
pt: vinho tinto
ro: vin roșu
ru: красное вино
sh: Crno vino
sk: víno červené
sr: Црно вино
sv: rödvin, rött vin
ta: திராட்சைச் செங்கள்
tr: Kırmızı şarap
uk: Червоне вино
vi: Rượu vang đỏ
zh: 紅葡萄酒

en: organic red wine
bg: био червено вино
fi: luomupunaviini, luomu punaviini
fr: vin rouge bio, vin rouge biologique, vin biologique contient des sulfites
hr: organsko crno vino
hu: bio vörösbor
it: vino rosso biologico
nl: biologische rode wijn

en: red wine from France
da: rødvin fra Frankrig
de: Rotwein aus Frankreich, französischer Rotwein
es: vino tinto francés, vino tinto de Francia
fr: vin rouge de France, vin rouge issu du cépage pinot noir, vin rouge issu des cépages merlot, vin rouge puy de dome igp, vin bordeaux rouge, vin rouge bordeaux, vin rouge bordeaux aoc, vin rouge coteaux du lyonnais, vin rouge cote de brouilly, vin rouge de Bourgogne
hr: crno vino sa zaštićenom oznakom zemljopisnog podrijetla iz Francuske
hu: francia vörösbor
it: vino rosso dalla Francia

en: red wine extract
bg: екстракт от червено вино
de: Rotwein-Extrakt
fi: punaviiniuute
fr: extrait de vin rouge
hr: ekstrakt crnog vina
hu: vörösbor kivonat
it: estratto di vino rosso

en: sauternes
ca: Vi de Sauternes
cv: Сотерн
de: Sauternes
es: Sauternes
fi: sauternes, sauternes-viini
fr: sauternes
he: יין סוטרן
hr: sauternes
it: sauternes
ja: ソーテルヌ
nb: Sauternes
nl: Sauternes
pt: Sauternes
ro: Sauternes
ru: Сотерн
sv: Sauternesviner
zh: 索泰爾納

en: rosé wine, rosé
ar: نبيذ وردي
bg: Розе
ca: vi rosat
da: rosévin
de: Roséwein
es: vino rosado
eu: Ardo gorri
fa: شراب گلی
fi: Roseeviini
fo: Rosévín
fr: vin rosé
hr: ružičasto vino
hu: rozébor
ia: Vino rosate
it: rosato
ja: ロゼワイン
ko: 로제 와인
lt: Rožinis vynas
mk: Розе вино
ml: റൊസേ വീഞ്ഞ്
nb: rosévin
nl: rosé wijn, roséwijn
nn: rosévin
pa: ਰੋਜ਼ੇ
pl: Wino różowe
pt: Vinho rosé
ro: vin rose
ru: Розовое вино
sv: rosévin
uk: Рожеве вино
vi: Rượu vang hồng
zh: 桃红葡萄酒

en: stale wine
ca: vi ranci
es: vino rancio
hr: ustajalo vino
it: vino stantio

en: liqueur wine, fortified wine
be: Мацаванае віно
bg: Ликьорно вино
ca: vi generós
cv: Мистель
da: Hedvin
de: Likörwein
eo: fortigita vino
es: vino fortificado
fa: شراب تقویت شده
fi: Väkevä viini
fo: Heitvín
fr: vin de liqueur
gl: Viño xeneroso
he: יין מחוזק
hr: likersko vino, desertno vino
hu: likőrbor
is: Styrkt vín
it: vino liquoroso
ja: 酒精強化ワイン
kk: Күшейтілген шараптар
ko: 강화 포도주
la: Mixtella
lt: Spirituotas vynas
mk: зајакнато вино
nb: Sterkvin
nl: likeurwijn, versterkte wijn
nn: Sterkvin
pl: Wino wzmacniane
pt: vinho fortificado
ro: Vin fortificat
ru: Креплёное вино
sh: Desertno vino
sv: Starkvin
uk: Вина кріплені
zh: 加强葡萄酒

en: Madeira, Madeira wine
an: Vin de Madeira
be: Мадэра
bg: Мадейра
ca: Vi de Madeira
cs: Madeira
cv: Мадера
da: Madeira
de: Madeira
el: Οίνος της Μαδέρας
eo: Madejra vino
es: Madeira
et: Madeira
eu: Madeira
fi: madeira, madeira-viini
fo: Madeiravín
fr: Madère, vin de Madère
gl: Viño da Madeira
he: יין מאדירה
hr: madeira
hu: Madeira
is: Madeiravín
it: Madeira
ja: マデイラ・ワイン
ka: მადერა
kk: Мадера
ko: 마데이라 포도주
nb: Madeira
nl: Madeira
pl: Madera
pt: Vinho da Madeira
ro: Vin de Madeira
ru: Мадера
sv: Madeiravin
tr: Madeira şarabı
uk: Мадера
uz: Madera
zh: 马德拉酒